dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="fā/ze__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zei</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zē</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žu</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēs</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mut/e__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ē</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēs</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lī/cis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ča</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cim</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cī</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ča</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cis</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ču</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiem</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čus</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čos</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiem</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>či</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiem</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>či</l>
          <r>cis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="analīze"><i>analī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aste"><i>ast</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atvere"><i>atver</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="audze"><i>aud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="avīze"><i>avī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bāze"><i>bāz</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dabasgāze"><i>dabasgā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="draudze"><i>draud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fāze"><i>fā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="flote"><i>flot</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gāze"><i>gāz</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="grāfiste"><i>grāfist</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="hercogiste"><i>hercogist</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ierocis"><i>iero</i><par n="lī/cis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="jūdze"><i>jūd</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karaliste"><i>karalist</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krīze"><i>krī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="līcis"><i>lī</i><par n="lī/cis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mute"><i>mut</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nogāze"><i>nogā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nozare"><i>nozar</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paaudze"><i>paaud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pēctecis"><i>pēcte</i><par n="lī/cis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="piekraste"><i>piekrast</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pieredze"><i>piered</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="priekštecis"><i>priekšte</i><par n="lī/cis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="princis"><i>prin</i><par n="lī/cis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="redze"><i>red</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reize"><i>rei</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sardze"><i>sard</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="spuldze"><i>spuld</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stūre"><i>stūr</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vēsture"><i>vēstur</i><par n="mut/e__n_f"/></e>
